Utah statutes.
53B-16-207.   Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah -- Career and technical education -- Supervision and administration -- Transition -- Institutional mission.

(1)  Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah shall:

(a)  maintain a strong curriculum in career and technical education courses at its campus and within the region it serves which can be transferred to other institutions within the higher education system, together with lower division courses and courses required for associate degrees in science, arts, applied science, and career and technical education;

(b)  work with school districts and charter schools in developing an aggressive concurrent enrollment program; and

(c)  provide for open-entry, open-exit competency-based career and technical education programs, at a low cost tuition rate for adults and at no tuition cost to secondary students, that emphasize short-term job training or retraining for immediate placement in the job market and serve the geographic area encompassing:

(i)  the Carbon School District;

(ii)  the Emery School District;

(iii)  the Grand School District; and

(iv)  the San Juan School District.

(2)  Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah may not exercise any jurisdiction over career and technical education provided by a school district or charter school independently of Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah.

(3)  Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah shall report to the State Board of Regents annually on:

(a)  the status of and maintenance of the effort for career and technical education in the region served by Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah, including access to open-entry, open-exit competency-based career and technical education programs; and

(b)  student tuition and fees.

(4)  Legislative appropriations to Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah career and technical education shall be made as line items that are separate from other appropriations for Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah.

